District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-303.18

Termination of contracts.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 318, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1183.18.

Prior Codifications